District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2504

Bond.

Repealed.

Apr. 23, 1892, 27 Stat. 21, ch. 53, § 2
Mar. 3, 1893, 27 Stat. 543, ch. 199
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1237, 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 132, 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 2-2104.
1973 Ed., § 2-1404.